Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 5. Records

§ 13-3-501.
Retention generally.

Each bank in this state shall retain its business records for the periods prescribed by W.S.

13-3-501

through

13-3-507

. W.S.

13-3-501

through

13-3-507

apply to national banks and trust companies where not in conflict with federal law, rule or regulation.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 57, §§ 1, 8; W.S. 1957, § 13-100.1; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1.

§ 13-3-502.
Permanent records.

Each bank shall permanently retain the minute books of meetings of its stockholders and directors, its capital stock ledger and capital stock certificate ledger or stubs, its general ledger (or the record kept by the bank in lieu thereof), its daily statements of condition and all records which the state banking commissioner requires to be retained permanently.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 57, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 13-100.2; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

§ 13-3-503.
Records retained 3 years.

All bank records pertaining to other parties such as safekeeping and escrow records shall be retained for three (3) years after the completion of the transactions pertaining to the records.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 57, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 13-100.3; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1.

§ 13-3-504.
Requirements of state banking commissioner.

All other bank records shall be retained for the periods prescribed by the state banking commissioner.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 57, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 13-100.4; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

§ 13-3-505.
State banking commissioner to issue rules.

The state banking commissioner shall issue rules classifying records kept by banks and prescribing the periods for which records of each class shall be retained. The rules shall be reviewed and considered for revision at least once every five (5) years. When issuing rules the state banking commissioner shall consider:

Actions and administrative proceedings in which the production of bank records might be necessary or desirable;

State and federal statutes of limitation applicable to actions or proceedings;

The availability of information contained in bank records from other sources;

Other matters pertinent to the interests of bank customers, shareholders and the people of the state of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 57, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 13-100.5; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 13-3-506.
Duty to produce.

After the period prescribed for the retention of records of its class the bank has no duty to produce the record in any action or proceeding if the records have been disposed of.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 57, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 13-100.6; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1.

§ 13-3-507.
Reproduction.

Any bank may cause any of its records including those held by it as a fiduciary, to be photographed, microfilmed or otherwise reproduced in permanent form. Any photograph or reproduction has the same effect as the original and shall be admitted in evidence in lieu of the original.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 57, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 13-100.7; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1.